dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- saqaf; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/aqaf__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aqaf</l>
          <r>aqaf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oqfa</l>
          <r>aqaf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tomna; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/omna__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omna</l>
          <r>omna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mien</l>
          <r>omna<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- riefnu; r; 2 -->
    <pardef n="r/iefnu__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iefnu</l>
          <r>iefnu<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiefen</l>
          <r>iefnu<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġonta; ġon; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġon/ta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xalla; xal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="xal/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġenb; ġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġ/enb__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enb</l>
          <r>enb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nub</l>
          <r>enb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ingravata; ingrava; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ingrava/ta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jjet</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tarbija; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/arbija__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arbija</l>
          <r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rabi</l>
          <r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- barmil; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/armil__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>armil</l>
          <r>armil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ramel</l>
          <r>armil<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gorboġ; g; 2 -->
    <pardef n="g/orboġ__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orboġ</l>
          <r>orboġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riebeġ</l>
          <r>orboġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xemx; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/emx__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emx</l>
          <r>emx<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mux</l>
          <r>emx<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġens; ġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġ/ens__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r>ens<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nus</l>
          <r>ens<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- maqdes; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/aqdes__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aqdes</l>
          <r>aqdes<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qades</l>
          <r>aqdes<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bieqja; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/ieqja__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieqja</l>
          <r>ieqja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wieqi</l>
          <r>ieqja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fqir; f; 3 -->
    <pardef n="f/qir__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qir</l>
          <r>qir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qar</l>
          <r>qir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oqra</l>
          <r>qir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pezza; pez; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pez/za__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>za</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċerċur; ċer; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċer/ċur__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ċur</l>
          <r>ċur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ċrie</l>
          <r>ċur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gozz; g; 2 -->
    <pardef n="g/ozz__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ozz</l>
          <r>ozz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zuz</l>
          <r>ozz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kappa; kap; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kap/pa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pa</l>
          <r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
          <r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċenpula; ċ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/enpula__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enpula</l>
          <r>enpula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niepel</l>
          <r>enpula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- moqdief; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/oqdief__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oqdief</l>
          <r>oqdief<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qadef</l>
          <r>oqdief<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- nbid; nb; 2 -->
    <pardef n="nb/id__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>id<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjed</l>
          <r>id<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żarżur; ż; 3 -->
    <pardef n="ż/arżur__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arżur</l>
          <r>arżur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rażar</l>
          <r>arżur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieżer</l>
          <r>arżur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qanfud; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/anfud__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anfud</l>
          <r>anfud<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niefed</l>
          <r>anfud<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="saqaf"><i>s</i><par n="s/aqaf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tomna"><i>t</i><par n="t/omna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="riefnu"><i>r</i><par n="r/iefnu__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġonta"><i>ġon</i><par n="ġon/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xalla"><i>xal</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġenb"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/enb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ingravata"><i>ingrava</i><par n="ingrava/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tarbija"><i>t</i><par n="t/arbija__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="barmil"><i>b</i><par n="b/armil__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gorboġ"><i>g</i><par n="g/orboġ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xemx"><i>x</i><par n="x/emx__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġens"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ens__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maqdes"><i>m</i><par n="m/aqdes__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bieqja"><i>b</i><par n="b/ieqja__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fqir"><i>f</i><par n="f/qir__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pezza"><i>pez</i><par n="pez/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerċur"><i>ċer</i><par n="ċer/ċur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gozz"><i>g</i><par n="g/ozz__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kappa"><i>kap</i><par n="kap/pa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċenpula"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/enpula__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="moqdief"><i>m</i><par n="m/oqdief__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nbid"><i>nb</i><par n="nb/id__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żarżur"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/arżur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qanfud"><i>q</i><par n="q/anfud__n_GD"/></e>
